Utah statutes.
62A-4a-709.   Medical assistance identification.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Adoption assistance" means financial support to adoptive parents provided under the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Titles IV (e) and XIX of the Social Security Act.

(b)  "Adoption assistance agreement" means a written agreement between the division and adoptive parents or between any state and adoptive parents, providing for adoption assistance.

(c)  "Interstate compact" means an agreement executed by the division with any other state, under the authority granted in Section 62A-4a-907.

(2)  The Employment Development Division in the Department of Workforce Services and the Division of Health Care Financing shall cooperate with the division and comply with interstate compacts.

(3)  A child who is a resident of this state and is the subject of an interstate compact is entitled to receive medical assistance identification from the Employment Development Division in the Department of Workforce Services and the Division of Health Care Financing by filing a certified copy of his adoption assistance agreement with that office.  The adoptive parents shall annually provide that office with evidence, verifying that the adoption assistance agreement is still effective.

(4)  The Employment Development Division in the Department of Workforce Services shall consider the holder of medical assistance identification received under this section as it does any other holder of medical assistance identification received under an adoption assistance agreement executed by the division.

(5)  The submission of any claim for payment or reimbursement under this section that is known to be false, misleading, or fraudulent is punishable as a third degree felony.

